Hawaii statutes.
§431:10-103 Exemptions of certain
contracts. The provisions of this part shall not apply to:

(1) Any contract which is a security subject to
federal jurisdiction;

(2) Any group contract covering a group of one
thousand or more lives at date of issue, other than a group credit life or
credit disability contract, except that any individual certificate issued under
a group contract delivered or issued for delivery in this State shall not be
exempt;

(3) Any group annuity contract which funds a pension,
profit sharing, or deferred compensation plan;

(4) Any form used in connection with, as a conversion
from, as an addition to, or in exchange under a contractual provision for a
contract delivered or issued for delivery on a form approved or permitted to be
issued prior to July 1, 1984; or

(5) The renewal of a contract delivered or issued for
delivery prior to July 1, 1984. [L 1987, c 347, pt of §2]

Previous
Vol09_Ch0431-0435H
Next